Maryland, session 2026, HB1577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–23.3.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “COMMON ELEMENT” MEANS ANY AREA IN A
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION IN WHICH MEMBERS HAVE A POSSESSORY
INTEREST IN COMMON.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1577*

HOUSE BILL 1577
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) THE ORDINARY MAINTENANCE OR NECESSARY REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT OF A COMMON ELEMENT; OR
(2) ANY MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR REPLACEMENT REQUEST THAT
DOES NOT EXCEED $1,000.
(C) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION
MAY NOT RENOVATE, EXPAND, UPGRADE, OR OTHERWISE SUBSTANTIALLY ALTER A
COMMON ELEMENT WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS.
(D) THE APPROVAL OF A MAJORITY OF MEMBERS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE OBTAINED BY ANY MEANS TO WHICH ALL
MEMBERS HAVE ACCESS.
Article – Real Property
11–108.3.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) THE ORDINARY MAINTENANCE OR NECESSARY REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT OF A COMMON ELEMENT; OR
(2) ANY MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR REPLACEMENT REQUEST THAT
DOES NOT EXCEED $1,000.
(B) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR OTHER GOVERNING BODY OF A
CONDOMINIUM MAY NOT RENOVATE, EXPAND, UPGRADE, OR OTHERWISE
SUBSTANTIALLY ALTER A COMMON ELEMENT WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF A
MAJORITY OF THE UNIT OWNERS IN GOOD STANDING.
(C) THE APPROVAL OF A MAJORITY OF UNIT OWNERS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE OBTAINED BY ANY MEANS TO WHICH ALL
UNIT OWNERS HAVE ACCESS.
11B–106.3.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) THE ORDINARY MAINTENANCE OR NECESSARY REPAIR OR
REPLACEMENT OF COMMON AREAS; OR

HOUSE BILL 1577 3
(2) ANY MAINTENANCE, REPAIR, OR REPLACEMENT REQUEST THAT
DOES NOT EXCEED $1,000.
(B) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT
RENOVATE, EXPAND, UPGRADE, OR OTHERWISE SUBSTANTIALLY ALTER COMMON
AREAS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION WITHOUT THE APPROVAL OF A
MAJORITY OF THE LOT OWNERS IN GOOD STANDING.
(C) THE APPROVAL OF A MAJORITY OF LOT OWNERS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE OBTAINED BY ANY MEANS TO WHICH ALL
LOT OWNERS HAVE ACCESS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.